South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 27-37-10(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) For residential rental agreements, nonpayment of rent within five ten days of the date due constitutes legal notice to the tenant that the landlord has the right to begin ejectment proceedings under this chapter if a written rental agreement specifies in bold conspicuous type that nonpayment of rent constitutes such notice. This requirement is satisfied if the written rental agreement contains the notice specified in Section 27-40-710(B). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----